Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.095

License suspension—Electronic benefit cards.

The department of licensing shall immediately suspend any license under this chapter if the department receives information that the license holder has not complied with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the license holder has remained otherwise eligible to be licensed, the department may reinstate the suspended license when the holder has complied with RCW 74.08.580(2).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 17.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 74.08A.260.

Finding—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See note following RCW 74.04.004.